Utah statutes.
58-70a-305.   Exemptions from licensure.
In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the
following persons may engage in acts included within the definition of
practice as a physician assistant, subject to the stated circumstances and
limitations, without being licensed under this chapter:
(1)  a student enrolled in an accredited physician assistant education program
while engaged in activities as a physician assistant:
(a)  that are a part of the education program;
(b)  that are conducted under the direct supervision of a physician associated
with the program; and
(c)  for which the program accepts in writing the responsibility for the
student; and
(2)  a person acting as a "medical assistant," as defined in Sections
58-67-102 and 58-68-102, and who:
(a)  is working under the direct supervision of a physician;
(b)  does not diagnose, advise, independently treat, or prescribe to or on
behalf of any person; and
(c)  for whom the supervising physician accepts responsibility.
